src/morphology/stems/altstem-adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_VAPAA
!! vapaa
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_SINGULARS ;
0   A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! tienoo
!o   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!o   A_BACK_SINGULARS ;
!o:0   A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!o:0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!o:0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!o:0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!o:0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!o:0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kerjuu
!u   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!u   A_BACK_SINGULARS ;
!u:0   A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!u   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!u   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!u:0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!u:0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!u:0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!u:0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!u:0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
LEXICON A_PEEAA
!! maa
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN    ;
0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! tee
!e   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!e   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!e:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!e   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
!e   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
!e:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!e:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!e:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!e:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! hai
!i   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!i   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!i:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!i   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
!i   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
!i:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!i:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!i:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!i:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! ookoo
!o   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!o   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!o:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
!o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON    ;
!o:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!o:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!o:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!o:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
LEXICON A_MUU
!! puu
0:u A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:u A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:u A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:u A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN    ;
0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:u  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! pyy
!y   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!y   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!y   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
!y   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
LEXICON A_SYYPÄÄ
!! pää
0:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN    ;
0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! köö
!ö   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ö   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
!ö   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN    ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! tie
!ie  A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ie  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!ie:e    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!ie  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
!ie  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
!ie:e    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!ie:e    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
!ie:e    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
!ie:e    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! suo
!uo  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!uo  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!uo:o    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!uo  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
!uo  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON    ;
!uo:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!uo:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
!uo:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!uo:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! työ
!yö  A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!yö  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!yö:ö    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!yö  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
!yö  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN    ;
!yö:o    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!yö:o    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
!yö:o    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!yö:o    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The words with at least bisyllabic stem ending in long vowel have:
!! nugaa
!! nugaata
!! nugaana
!! nugaahan
!! nugaaseen
!! nugaissa
!! nugaista
!! nugaaseen
!! nugaiden
!! nugaitten
!! nugaisiin
!! nugaihin
!a   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!a   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!a:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!a   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!a   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN   ;
!a   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!a:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!a:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!a:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!a:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!a:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The words with at least bisyllabic stem ending in long vowel have:
!! patee
!! pateeta
!! pateena
!! pateehen
!! pateeseen
!! pateissa
!! pateista
!! pateeseen
!! pateiden
!! pateitten
!! pateisiin
!! pateihin
!e   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!e   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!e:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!e   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!e   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN   ;
!e   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!e:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!e:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!e:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!e:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!e:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!!LEXICON A_
!! No examples
!!i   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!!i   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!!i:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!!i   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!!i   hA_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN   ;
!!i   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!!i:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!!i:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!!i:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!!i:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!!i:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The words with at least bisyllabic stem ending in long vowel have:
!! trikoo
!! trikoota
!! trikoona
!! trikoissa
!! trikoista
!! trikooseen
!! trikoiden
!! trikoitten
!! trikoihin
!! trikoisiin
!o   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!o   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!o:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN   ;
!o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!o:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!o:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!o:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!o:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!o:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The words with at least bisyllabic stem ending in long vowel have:
!! raguu
!! raguuta
!! raguuna
!! raguussa
!! raguista
!! raguuseen
!! raguiden
!! raguitten
!! raguisiin
!! raguihen
!u   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!u   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!u:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!u   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!u   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN   ;
!u   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!u:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!u:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!u:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!u:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!u:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The words with at least bisyllabic stem ending in long vowel have:
!! fondyy
!! fondyytä
!! fondyynä
!! fondyyssä
!! fondyistä
!! fondyyseen
!! nugaiden
!! nugaitten
!! nugaisiin
!! nugaihin
!y   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!y   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
!y   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!y   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN   ;
!y   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!y:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!!LEXICON A_
!! No examples
!!ö   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!!ö   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!!ö:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
!!ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!!ö   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!!ö:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!!ö:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!!ö:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!!ö:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!!ö:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The words with at least bisyllabic stem ending in long vowel have:
!! miljöö
!! miljöötä
!! miljoöönä
!! miljöössä
!! miljöistä
!! miljööseen
!! miljöiden
!! miljöitten
!! miljöisiin
!! milhjöihin
!ö   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ö   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
!ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!ö   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!ö:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! Some loan words inflect irregularly, either more along the written form or
!! the pronunciation, e.g. fondue is pronounced @ipa fondy: but can also be
!! @ipa fondue:
!! fondue
!! fondueta
!! fonduetä
!! fonduena
!! fonduenä
!! fonduessa
!! fonduessä
!! fodnueina
!! fondueinä
!! fondueista
!! fondueistä
!! fondueita
!! fondueitä
!! fondueiden
!! fondueisiin
!! fondueiden
!! fondueitten
!! fondueihin
!! why not fondueisiin
!0   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!0   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!0   A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!0   A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!0   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!0   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
!0   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
!0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!0   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!0   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!0   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
LEXICON A_GAY
!! Some loan words inflect irregularly, either more along the written form or
!! the pronunciation. 
0   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0   A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN    ;
0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
0   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
0   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN   ;
0   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
